Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2430
Participant registry.

The department shall establish and maintain a participant registry for the program. The participant registry shall include the participant's name, address, and telephone number and shall identify whether the participant is a physician's office, a pharmacy, a hospital, or a health clinic. The department shall make the participant registry available to any person or entity wishing to donate cancer drugs to the program.

Laws 2005, LB 331, § 7.